Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
UNIFORM DISPOSITION OF COMMUNITY

PROPERTY
RIGHTS AT DEATH ACT

§510-21 Application. This part applies
to the disposition at death of the following property acquired by a married
person:

(1) All personal property, wherever situated:

(A) Which was acquired as or became, and
remained, community property under the laws of another jurisdiction;

(B) All or the proportionate part of that
property acquired with the rents, issues, or income of, or the proceeds from,
or in exchange for, that community property; or

(C) Traceable to that community property;

(2) All or the proportionate part of any real
property situated in this State which was acquired with the rents, issues, or
income of, the proceeds from, or in exchange for, property acquired as or which
became, and remained, community property under the laws of another
jurisdiction, or property traceable to that community property. [L 1973, c 132,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next